Illinois, session 104th, HB4442.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The High-Speed Railway Commission Act is 5amended by changing Section 20 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 4102/20)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2027)8    Sec. 20. Repeal. This Act is repealed on January 1, 2030 92027.10(Source: P.A. 102-261, eff. 8-6-21.) 11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 12becoming law.